Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
Restoration to Reason

§ 93-13-151.
Procedure for restoration to reason; discharge of guardian [Repealed effective January 1, 2020].

When any person for whom a guardian has been appointed or who has been found to be in need of mental treatment, under the provisions of Sections 41-21-61 through 41-21-105 or any other statute, shall be restored to reason, the chancery court of the county wherein such guardian was appointed or such adjudication had may so determine and adjudicate upon the filing of a proper petition therefor, supported by such proof as the chancellor may deem sufficient. Such a petition may be heard by such chancellor, either in term-time or in vacation, at such time and place as the chancellor may fix; and at such hearing, all interested parties shall have the right to appear and offer testimony. Such adjudication of such person’s restoration to reason shall be competent proof thereof in any court of competent jurisdiction; and if a guardian of the estate and property, or either, of such person shall have been appointed and be then serving, such guardian shall forthwith be discharged and the control of the estate of such person returned to him.

HISTORY:
Repealed by Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 14, eff from and after January 1, 2020.